apertium-fr-pt.pt.dix
	 <pardef n="/a__pr">
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>a</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="RL">
			 <p>
				 <l><a/>a</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>ao</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>aos</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>à</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>às</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>àquele</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>aquele<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>àqueles</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>aquele<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>àquela</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>aquele<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>àquelas</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>aquele<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>àquilo</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>aquilo<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>às<b/>minhas</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>meu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>à<b/>minha</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>meu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>aos<b/>meus</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>meu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>ao<b/>meu</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>meu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>às<b/>nossas</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>nosso<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>à<b/>nossa</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>nosso<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>aos<b/>nossos</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>nosso<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>ao<b/>nosso</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>nosso<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>às<b/>suas</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>seu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>à<b/>sua</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>seu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>aos<b/>seus</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>seu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>ao<b/>seu</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>seu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>às<b/>tuas</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>teu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>à<b/>tua</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>teu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>aos<b/>teus</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>teu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>ao<b/>teu</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>teu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>às<b/>vossas</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>vosso<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>à<b/>vossa</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>vosso<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>aos<b/>vossos</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>vosso<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>ao<b/>vosso</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>vosso<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>às<b/>quais</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>qual<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>à<b/>qual</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>qual<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>aos<b/>quais</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>qual<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>ao<b/>qual</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>qual<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
<!--		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>às<b/>que</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>que<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>à<b/>que</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>que<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>aos<b/>que</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>que<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>ao<b/>que</l>
				 <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>o<b/>que<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>-->
	 </pardef>
  </pardefs>

      <e lm="a">
        <i/>
        <par n="/a__pr"/>
      </e>
		<e lm="com respeito a">
			<i>com<b/>respeito<b/></i>
			<par n="/a__pr"/>
		</e>
		<e lm="devido a">
			<i>devido<b/></i>
			<par n="/a__pr"/>
		</e>
		<e lm="em frente a">
			<i>em<b/>frente<b/></i>
			<par n="/a__pr"/>
		</e>
		<e lm="graças a">
			<i>graças<b/></i>
			<par n="/a__pr"/>
		</e>
        <e lm="no que diz respeito a">
			<i>no<b/>que<b/>diz<b/>respeito<b/></i>
			<par n="/a__pr"/>
		</e>
<e lm="presente a">
			<i>presente<b/></i>
			<par n="/a__pr"/>
		</e>
        <e lm="referente a"><i>referente<b/></i><par n="/a__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="quanto a" a="imaxin|software">
		<i>quanto<b/></i>
		<par n="/a__pr"/>
	</e>
